Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.035

Examinations—Scope—Time and place.

(1) All qualified applicants for a license as a physical therapist shall be examined by the board at such time and place as the board may determine. The board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities. The examination shall embrace the following subjects: The applied sciences of anatomy, neuroanatomy, kinesiology, physiology, pathology, psychology, physics; physical therapy, as defined in this chapter, applied to medicine, neurology, orthopedics, pediatrics, psychiatry, surgery; medical ethics; technical procedures in the practice of physical therapy as defined in this chapter; and such other subjects as the board may deem useful to test the applicant's fitness to practice physical therapy. Examinations shall be held within the state at least once a year, at such time and place as the board shall determine. An applicant who fails an examination may apply for reexamination upon payment of a reexamination fee determined by the secretary.

(2) All qualified applicants for a license as a physical therapist assistant must be examined by the board at such a time and place as the board may determine. The board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

[ 2014 c 116 s 4; 2007 c 98 s 4; 1995 c 198 s 10; 1991 c 3 s 176; 1983 c 116 s 7; 1961 c 64 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 116: See note following RCW 18.74.190.